Wisconsin, session 2025, SB786.
do enact as follows:SB786,11Section 1. 97.01 (9g) of the statutes is created to read:SB786,3,1197.01 (9g) “Major food allergen” has the meaning given in 21 USC 321 (qq).SB786,22Section 2. 97.29 (2) (b) 2. e. of the statutes is amended to read:SB786,3,10397.29 (2) (b) 2. e. Each container of food product that is sold is labeled with the 4name and address of the person who prepared and canned the food product, the 5date on which the food product was canned, the statement “This product was made 6in a private home not subject to state licensing or inspection.”, and a list of 7ingredients in descending order of prominence. If any ingredient originates from 8milk, eggs, fish, crustacean shellfish, tree nuts, wheat, peanuts, or soybeans is a 9major food allergen, the list of ingredients shall include the common name of the 10ingredient each major food allergen.SB786,311Section 3. 97.29 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB786,3,191297.29 (5) Rule making. The department may promulgate rules to establish 13the fees required under sub. (3) (a) or (c) or to govern the operation of food 14processing plants. Rules may include standards for the construction and 15maintenance of facilities; the design, installation, cleaning and maintenance of 16equipment and utensils; personnel sanitation; food handling and storage; sanitary 17production and processing; and food sources and food labeling. Any rule 18promulgated under this subsection addressing food allergens shall cover all major 19food allergens.SB786,420Section 4. 97.30 (5) of the statutes is amended to read:SB786,4,52197.30 (5) Rule making. The department may promulgate rules to establish 22the fees required under sub. (3) or to govern the operation of retail food 23establishments. Rules may include standards for the construction and 24maintenance of facilities; the design, installation, cleaning and maintenance of 1equipment and utensils; personnel sanitation; food handling, display and storage; 2and food sources and food labeling. Any rule promulgated under this subsection 3addressing food allergens shall cover all major food allergens. No rule promulgated 4under this subsection may prohibit dogs from the premises of a retail food 5establishment that sells only previously packaged food.SB786,56Section 5. 97.33 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 97.33 (2) (intro.) and 7amended to read:SB786,4,10897.33 (2) (intro.) Except as provided in s. 93.135, the department may issue a 9certificate of food protection practices to an individual who satisfactorily completes 10to whom all of the following apply:SB786,4,1211(a) The individual has satisfactorily completed an approved examination or 12who has achieved comparable compliance.SB786,613Section 6. 97.33 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB786,4,161497.33 (2) (b) The individual has received training in basic allergen awareness 15principles approved by the department as meeting the standards established under 16sub. (6) (d).SB786,717Section 7. 97.33 (3) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB786,4,211897.33 (3) (intro.) Each certificate is valid for 5 years from the date of issuance 19and, except as provided in s. 93.135, may be renewed by the certificate holder if he 20or she satisfactorily completes the training specified in sub. (2) (b) and all of the 21following:SB786,822Section 8. 97.33 (6) (d) of the statutes is created to read:SB786,5,22397.33 (6) (d) Specifying standards for training in basic allergen awareness 1principles under sub. (2) (b), which shall include instruction and assessment of 2knowledge as to all of the following topics:SB786,5,331. Food allergies and major food allergens.SB786,5,542. The dangers of food allergies, symptoms of an allergic reaction to food, and 5responding to emergencies involving allergic reactions.SB786,5,763. Proper food hygiene and cleaning methods and preventing cross-contact 7and allergen contamination.SB786,5,984. Communication with customers and staff about allergens and dietary 9restrictions.SB786,5,11105. The importance of food labels and proper food preparation for customers 11with food allergies.SB786,5,14126. Understanding gluten, including sources of gluten, symptoms of gluten 13intolerance and celiac disease, the importance of gluten-free food preparation and 14handling, and proper cleaning methods to prevent gluten contamination.SB786,915Section 9. Initial applicability.SB786,5,1916(1) Certificate of food protection practices. The treatment of s. 97.33 17(2) (b), (3) (intro.), and (6) (d) first applies to applications received by the 18department of agriculture, trade and consumer protection on the effective date of 19this subsection.SB786,5,2120(2) Home-canned food products. The treatment of s. 97.29 (2) (b) 2. e. first 21applies to sales made on the effective date of this subsection.SB786,1022Section 10. Effective date.SB786,6,21(1) This act takes effect on the first day of the 7th month beginning after 2publication.SB786,6,33